Utah statutes.
41-19-2.   Participation by political subdivisions.

The Legislature of the state of Utah hereby authorizes the political subdivisions of this state to participate in the state highway safety program as contemplated by the federal Highway Safety Act of 1966, and any amendments thereto, and to do all things necessary to secure benefits available under that act.

